Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.030

Arterial highway.

"Arterial highway" means every public highway, or portion thereof, designated as such by proper authority.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.030. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 4; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]